algorithms/greek/stem_Unicode.sbl
  define step5i as (
    [substring] among (
      '{a}{g}{a}' '{a}{g}{e}{s}' '{a}{g}{e}' (
        delete
        do unset test1
        (['{k}{o}{l}{l}'] -> s <- '{a}{g}' insert s) or (
          not ([substring] among ('{ps}{o}{f}' '{n}{a}{u}{l}{o}{ch}'))
          ([substring] among (
            '{o}{f}' '{p}{e}{l}' '{ch}{o}{r}{t}' '{l}{l}' '{s}{f}' '{r}{p}' '{f}{r}' '{p}{r}' '{l}{o}{ch}' '{s}{m}{i}{n}'
            (-> s <- '{a}{g}' insert s)
          )) or
          ([substring] atlimit among (
            '{a}{v}{a}{s}{t}' '{p}{o}{l}{u}{f}' '{a}{d}{i}{f}' '{p}{a}{m}{f}' '{r}' '{a}{s}{p}' '{a}{f}' '{a}{m}{a}{l}' '{a}{m}{a}{l}{l}{y}'
            '{a}{n}{u}{s}{t}' '{a}{p}{e}{r}' '{a}{s}{p}{a}{r}' '{a}{ch}{a}{r}' '{d}{e}{r}{v}{e}{n}' '{d}{r}{o}{s}{o}{p}' '{x}{e}{f}' '{n}{e}{o}{p}'
            '{n}{o}{m}{o}{t}' '{o}{l}{o}{p}' '{o}{m}{o}{t}' '{p}{r}{o}{s}{t}' '{p}{r}{o}{s}{oo}{p}{o}{p}' '{s}{u}{m}{p}' '{s}{u}{n}{t}' '{t}' '{u}{p}{o}{t}'
            '{ch}{a}{r}' '{a}{e}{y}{p}' '{a}{y}{m}{o}{s}{t}' '{a}{n}{u}{p}' '{a}{p}{o}{t}' '{a}{r}{t}{y}{p}' '{d}{y}{a}{t}' '{e}{n}' '{e}{p}{y}{t}'
            '{k}{r}{o}{k}{a}{l}{o}{p}' '{s}{y}{d}{i}{r}{o}{p}' '{l}' '{n}{a}{u}' '{o}{u}{l}{a}{m}' '{o}{u}{r}' '{p}' '{t}{r}' '{m}'
            (-> s <- '{a}{g}' insert s)
          ))
        )
      )
    )
  )

  define step5j as (
    [substring] among (
      '{i}{s}{e}' '{i}{s}{o}{u}' '{i}{s}{a}' (delete do unset test1)
    )
    [substring] atlimit among (
      '{n}' '{ch}{e}{r}{s}{o}{n}' '{d}{oo}{d}{e}{k}{a}{n}' '{e}{r}{i}{m}{o}{n}' '{m}{e}{g}{a}{l}{o}{n}' '{e}{p}{t}{a}{n}' (-> s <- '{i}{s}' insert s)
    )
  )

  define step5k as (
    [substring] among (
      '{i}{s}{t}{e}' (delete do unset test1)
    )
    [substring] atlimit among (
      '{a}{s}{v}' '{s}{v}' '{a}{ch}{r}' '{ch}{r}' '{a}{p}{l}' '{a}{e}{y}{m}{n}' '{d}{u}{s}{ch}{r}' '{e}{u}{ch}{r}' '{k}{o}{y}{n}{o}{ch}{r}' '{p}{a}{l}{y}{m}{ps}'
      (-> s <- '{i}{s}{t}' insert s)
    )
  )

  define step5l as (
    [substring] among (
      '{o}{u}{n}{e}' '{i}{s}{o}{u}{n}{e}' '{i}{th}{o}{u}{n}{e}' (delete do unset test1)
    )
    [substring] atlimit among (
      '{n}' '{r}' '{s}{p}{y}' '{s}{t}{r}{a}{v}{o}{m}{o}{u}{t}{s}' '{k}{a}{k}{o}{m}{o}{u}{t}{s}' '{e}{x}{oo}{n}' (-> s <- '{o}{u}{n}' insert s)
    )
  )

  define step5m as (
    [substring] among (
      '{o}{u}{m}{e}' '{i}{s}{o}{u}{m}{e}' '{i}{th}{o}{u}{m}{e}' (delete do unset test1)
    )
    [substring] atlimit among (
      '{p}{a}{r}{a}{s}{o}{u}{s}' '{f}' '{ch}' '{oo}{r}{y}{o}{p}{l}' '{a}{z}' '{a}{l}{l}{o}{s}{o}{u}{s}' '{a}{s}{o}{u}{s}'
      (-> s <- '{o}{u}{m}' insert s)
    )
  )

  define step6 as (
    do (
      [substring] among (
        '{m}{a}{t}{a}' '{m}{a}{t}{oo}{n}' '{m}{a}{t}{o}{s}' (<- '{m}{a}')
      )
    )
    test1
    [substring] among (
      '{a}' '{a}{g}{a}{t}{e}' '{a}{g}{a}{n}' '{a}{e}{y}' '{a}{m}{a}{y}' '{a}{n}' '{a}{s}' '{a}{s}{a}{y}' '{a}{t}{a}{y}' '{a}{oo}' '{e}' '{e}{y}'
      '{e}{y}{s}' '{e}{y}{t}{e}' '{e}{s}{a}{y}' '{e}{s}' '{e}{t}{a}{y}' '{y}' '{y}{e}{m}{a}{y}' '{y}{e}{m}{a}{s}{t}{e}' '{y}{e}{t}{a}{y}' '{y}{e}{s}{a}{y}'
      '{y}{e}{s}{a}{s}{t}{e}' '{y}{o}{m}{a}{s}{t}{a}{n}' '{y}{o}{m}{o}{u}{n}' '{y}{o}{m}{o}{u}{n}{a}' '{y}{o}{n}{t}{a}{n}' '{y}{o}{n}{t}{o}{u}{s}{a}{n}' '{y}{o}{s}{a}{s}{t}{a}{n}'
      '{y}{o}{s}{a}{s}{t}{e}' '{y}{o}{s}{o}{u}{n}' '{y}{o}{s}{o}{u}{n}{a}' '{y}{o}{t}{a}{n}' '{y}{o}{u}{m}{a}' '{y}{o}{u}{m}{a}{s}{t}{e}' '{y}{o}{u}{n}{t}{a}{y}'
      '{y}{o}{u}{n}{t}{a}{n}' '{i}' '{i}{d}{e}{s}' '{i}{d}{oo}{n}' '{i}{th}{e}{y}' '{i}{th}{e}{y}{s}' '{i}{th}{e}{y}{t}{e}' '{i}{th}{i}{k}{a}{t}{e}' '{i}{th}{i}{k}{a}{n}'
      '{i}{th}{o}{u}{n}' '{i}{th}{oo}' '{i}{k}{a}{t}{e}' '{i}{k}{a}{n}' '{i}{s}' '{i}{s}{a}{n}' '{i}{s}{a}{t}{e}' '{i}{s}{e}{y}' '{i}{s}{e}{s}' '{i}{s}{o}{u}{n}'
      '{i}{s}{oo}' '{o}' '{o}{y}' '{o}{m}{a}{y}' '{o}{m}{a}{s}{t}{a}{n}' '{o}{m}{o}{u}{n}' '{o}{m}{o}{u}{n}{a}' '{o}{n}{t}{a}{y}' '{o}{n}{t}{a}{n}'
      '{o}{n}{t}{o}{u}{s}{a}{n}' '{o}{s}' '{o}{s}{a}{s}{t}{a}{n}' '{o}{s}{a}{s}{t}{e}' '{o}{s}{o}{u}{n}' '{o}{s}{o}{u}{n}{a}' '{o}{t}{a}{n}' '{o}{u}' '{o}{u}{m}{a}{y}'
      '{o}{u}{m}{a}{s}{t}{e}' '{o}{u}{n}' '{o}{u}{n}{t}{a}{y}' '{o}{u}{n}{t}{a}{n}' '{o}{u}{s}' '{o}{u}{s}{a}{n}' '{o}{u}{s}{a}{t}{e}' '{u}' '{u}{s}' '{oo}'
      '{oo}{n}' (delete)
    )
  )

  define step7 as (
    [substring] among (
      '{e}{s}{t}{e}{r}' '{e}{s}{t}{a}{t}' '{o}{t}{e}{r}' '{o}{t}{a}{t}' '{u}{t}{e}{r}' '{u}{t}{a}{t}' '{oo}{t}{e}{r}' '{oo}{t}{a}{t}' (delete)
    )
  )
)

define stem as (
    backwards (
      do tolower
      has_min_length
      set test1
      do step1
      do steps1
      do steps2
      do steps3
      do steps4
      do steps5
      do steps6
      do steps7
      do steps8
      do steps9
      do steps10
      do step2a
      do step2b
      do step2c
      do step2d
      do step3
      do step4
      do step5a
      do step5b
      do step5c
      do step5d
      do step5e
      do step5f
      do step5g
      do step5h
      do step5j
      do step5i
      do step5k
      do step5l
      do step5m
      do step6
      do step7
    )
)
